test/src/morphology/N-herneh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - herneh: # Noun 'pea / herne' - full paradigm
     herneh+N+Sg+Nom: herneh
     herneh+N+Sg+Gen: hernehen
     herneh+N+Sg+Acc: [herneh, hernehen]
     herneh+N+Sg+Par: hernehty
     herneh+N+Sg+Tra: hernehekse
     herneh+N+Sg+Abe: [hernehettä, hernehetä, hernehettäh]
     herneh+N+Sg+Com: hernehenke
     herneh+N+Sg+Ine: hernehes
     herneh+N+Sg+Ela: [hernehespäi, hernehes]
     herneh+N+Sg+Ill: herneheh
     herneh+N+Sg+Ade: hernehel
     herneh+N+Sg+Abl: [hernehelpäi, hernehel]
     herneh+N+Sg+All: hernehele
     herneh+N+Sg+Ess: hernehenny
     herneh+N+Sg+Ter: hernehessäh
     herneh+N+Sg+Apr: hernehellyö
     herneh+N+Pl+Nom: hernehet
     herneh+N+Pl+Gen: hernehien
     herneh+N+Pl+Acc: hernehet
     herneh+N+Pl+Par: hernehii
     herneh+N+Pl+Tra: hernehikse
     herneh+N+Pl+Abe: [hernehittä, hernehitä, hernehittäh]
     herneh+N+Pl+Com: hernehienke
     herneh+N+Pl+Ine: hernehis
     herneh+N+Pl+Ela: [hernehispäi, hernehis]
     herneh+N+Pl+Ill: hernehih
     herneh+N+Pl+Ade: hernehil
     herneh+N+Pl+Abl: [hernehilpäi, hernehil]
     herneh+N+Pl+All: hernehile
     herneh+N+Pl+Ess: hernehinny
     herneh+N+Pl+Ins: hernehin
     herneh+N+Pl+Apr: hernehiellyö
     herneh+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: hernehgi
     herneh+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: hernehengi
     herneh+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [hernehgi, hernehengi]
     herneh+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: hernehtygi
     herneh+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: herneheksegi
     herneh+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [hernehettägi, hernehetägi, hernehettähgi]
     herneh+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: hernehenkegi
     herneh+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: hernehesgi
     herneh+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [hernehespäigi, hernehesgi]
     herneh+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: hernehehgi
     herneh+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: hernehelgi
     herneh+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [hernehelpäigi, hernehelgi]
     herneh+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: hernehelegi
     herneh+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: hernehennygi
     herneh+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: hernehessähgi
     herneh+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: hernehellyögi
     herneh+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: hernehetgi
     herneh+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: hernehiengi
     herneh+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: hernehetgi
     herneh+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: hernehiigi
     herneh+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: hernehiksegi
     herneh+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [hernehittägi, hernehitägi, hernehittähgi]
     herneh+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: hernehienkegi
     herneh+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: hernehisgi
     herneh+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [hernehispäigi, hernehisgi]
     herneh+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: hernehihgi
     herneh+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: hernehilgi
     herneh+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [hernehilpäigi, hernehilgi]
     herneh+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: hernehilegi
     herneh+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: hernehinnygi
     herneh+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: hernehingi
     herneh+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: hernehiellyögi
